District of Columbia statutes.
1-328.02

Grants for planning and planning implementation purposes.

The Mayor may issue grants to individuals and organizations from local revenue, dedicated tax revenue, special purpose revenue, and capital funds in furtherance of the Mayor’s planning mission under § 1-204.23, subject to available appropriations, and subject to the provisions of § 47-368.06.

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2212, 57 DCR 6242

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-301.78.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 1-301.78.

Temporary Addition of Section

Section 402 of D.C. Law 18-222 added sections to read as follows:
“Sec. 402. Grants for planning and planning implementation purposes. ”The Mayor may issue grants to individuals and organizations in furtherance of the Mayor’s planning mission under section 423 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 792; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.23), subject to appropriations and the provisions of D.C. Official Code § 47-368.06 from:
“(1) Local revenue;
“(2) Dedicated tax revenue;
“(3) Special purpose revenue; and
“(4) Capital funds.”
Section 2002(b) of D.C. Law 18-222 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2212 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 402 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 402 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).

Short Title

Short title: Section 2211 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle R of title II of the act may be cited as the “Planning Grant-making Authority Act of 2010”.